Illinois, session 104th, HB5620.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Section 65 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/65)7    Sec. 65. Prohibited areas. 8    (a) A licensee under this Act shall not knowingly carry a 9firearm on or into:10        (1) Any building, real property, and parking area 11    under the control of a public or private elementary or 12    secondary school.13        (2) Any building, real property, and parking area 14    under the control of a pre-school or child care facility, 15    including any room or portion of a building under the 16    control of a pre-school or child care facility. Nothing in 17    this paragraph shall prevent the operator of a child care 18    facility in a family home from owning or possessing a 19    firearm in the home or license under this Act, if no child 20    under child care at the home is present in the home or the 21    firearm in the home is stored in a locked container when a 22    child under child care at the home is present in the home.23        (3) Any building, parking area, or portion of a   HB5620- 2 -LRB104 16239 BDA 29623 b1    building under the control of an officer of the executive 2    or legislative branch of government, provided that nothing 3    in this paragraph shall prohibit a licensee from carrying 4    a concealed firearm onto the real property, bikeway, or 5    trail in a park regulated by the Department of Natural 6    Resources or any other designated public hunting area or 7    building where firearm possession is permitted as 8    established by the Department of Natural Resources under 9    Section 1.8 of the Wildlife Code.10        (4) Any building designated for matters before a 11    circuit court, an appellate court, or the Supreme Court, 12    or any building or portion of a building under the control 13    of the Supreme Court. This prohibition does not apply to 14    any holder of a concealed carry license who is an 15    incumbent or retired judge of the Illinois Supreme Court, 16    the Illinois Appellate Court, or an Illinois circuit 17    court, regardless of whether the judge was elected or 18    appointed. 19        (5) Any building or portion of a building under the 20    control of a unit of local government.21        (6) Any building, real property, and parking area 22    under the control of an adult or juvenile detention or 23    correctional institution, prison, or jail.24        (7) Any building, real property, and parking area 25    under the control of a public or private hospital or 26    hospital affiliate, mental health facility, or nursing   HB5620- 3 -LRB104 16239 BDA 29623 b1    home.2        (8) Any bus, train, or form of transportation paid for 3    in whole or in part with public funds, and any building, 4    real property, and parking area under the control of a 5    public transportation facility paid for in whole or in 6    part with public funds. This prohibition does not apply to 7    any holder of a concealed carry license who is an 8    incumbent or retired judge of the Illinois Supreme Court, 9    the Illinois Appellate Court, or an Illinois circuit 10    court, regardless of whether the judge was elected or 11    appointed. 12        (9) Any building, real property, and parking area 13    under the control of an establishment that serves alcohol 14    on its premises, if more than 50% of the establishment's 15    gross receipts within the prior 3 months are is from the 16    sale of alcohol. The owner of an establishment who 17    knowingly fails to prohibit concealed firearms on its 18    premises as provided in this paragraph or who knowingly 19    makes a false statement or record to avoid the prohibition 20    on concealed firearms under this paragraph is subject to 21    the penalty under subsection (c-5) of Section 10-1 of the 22    Liquor Control Act of 1934.23        (10) Any public gathering or special event conducted 24    on property open to the public that requires the issuance 25    of a permit from the unit of local government, provided 26    this prohibition shall not apply to a licensee who must   HB5620- 4 -LRB104 16239 BDA 29623 b1    walk through a public gathering in order to access his or 2    her residence, place of business, or vehicle.3        (11) Any building or real property that has been 4    issued a special event retailer's Special Event Retailer's 5    license as defined in Section 1-3.17.1 of the Liquor 6    Control Act of 1934 during the time designated for the 7    sale of alcohol by the special event retailer's Special 8    Event Retailer's license, or a special Special use permit 9    license as defined in subsection (q) of Section 5-1 of the 10    Liquor Control Act of 1934 during the time designated for 11    the sale of alcohol by the special Special use permit 12    license.13        (12) Any public playground.14        (13) Any public park, athletic area, or athletic 15    facility under the control of a municipality or park 16    district, provided nothing in this Section shall prohibit 17    a licensee from carrying a concealed firearm while on a 18    trail or bikeway if only a portion of the trail or bikeway 19    includes a public park.20        (14) Any real property under the control of the Cook 21    County Forest Preserve District.22        (15) Any building, classroom, laboratory, medical 23    clinic, hospital, artistic venue, athletic venue, 24    entertainment venue, officially recognized 25    university-related organization property, whether owned or 26    leased, and any real property, including parking areas,   HB5620- 5 -LRB104 16239 BDA 29623 b1    sidewalks, and common areas under the control of a public 2    or private community college, college, or university.3        (16) Any building, real property, or parking area 4    under the control of a gaming facility licensed under the 5    Illinois Gambling Act or the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 6    1975, including an inter-track wagering location licensee.7        (17) Any stadium, arena, or the real property or 8    parking area under the control of a stadium, arena, or any 9    collegiate or professional sporting event.10        (18) Any building, real property, or parking area 11    under the control of a public library.12        (19) Any building, real property, or parking area 13    under the control of an airport.14        (20) Any building, real property, or parking area 15    under the control of an amusement park.16        (21) Any building, real property, or parking area 17    under the control of a zoo or museum.18        (22) Any street, driveway, parking area, property, 19    building, or facility, owned, leased, controlled, or used 20    by a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site 21    or facility regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory 22    Commission. The licensee shall not under any circumstance 23    store a firearm or ammunition in his or her vehicle or in a 24    compartment or container within a vehicle located anywhere 25    in or on the street, driveway, parking area, property, 26    building, or facility described in this paragraph.  HB5620- 6 -LRB104 16239 BDA 29623 b1        (23) Any area where firearms are prohibited under 2    federal law.3    (a-5) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a public or 4private community college, college, or university from:5        (1) prohibiting persons from carrying a firearm within 6    a vehicle owned, leased, or controlled by the college or 7    university;8        (2) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 9    regarding student, employee, or visitor misconduct and 10    discipline, including suspension and expulsion;11        (3) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 12    regarding the storage or maintenance of firearms, which 13    must include designated areas where persons can park 14    vehicles that carry firearms; and15        (4) permitting the carrying or use of firearms for the 16    purpose of instruction and curriculum of officially 17    recognized programs, including, but not limited to, 18    military science and law enforcement training programs, or 19    in any designated area used for hunting purposes or target 20    shooting.21    (a-10) The owner of private real property of any type may 22prohibit the carrying of concealed firearms on the property 23under his or her control. The owner must post a sign in 24accordance with subsection (d) of this Section indicating that 25firearms are prohibited on the property, unless the property 26is a private residence.  HB5620- 7 -LRB104 16239 BDA 29623 b1    (b) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (a-5), and (a-10) of 2this Section except under paragraph (22) or (23) of subsection 3(a), any licensee prohibited from carrying a concealed firearm 4into the parking area of a prohibited location specified in 5subsection (a), (a-5), or (a-10) of this Section shall be 6permitted to carry a concealed firearm on or about his or her 7person within a vehicle into the parking area and may store a 8firearm or ammunition concealed in a case within a locked 9vehicle or locked container out of plain view within the 10vehicle in the parking area. A licensee may carry a concealed 11firearm in the immediate area surrounding his or her vehicle 12within a prohibited parking lot area only for the limited 13purpose of storing or retrieving a firearm within the 14vehicle's trunk. For purposes of this subsection, "case" 15includes a glove compartment or console that completely 16encloses the concealed firearm or ammunition, the trunk of the 17vehicle, or a firearm carrying box, shipping box, or other 18container.19    (c) A licensee shall not be in violation of this Section 20while he or she is traveling along a public right of way that 21touches or crosses any of the premises under subsection (a), 22(a-5), or (a-10) of this Section if the concealed firearm is 23carried on his or her person in accordance with the provisions 24of this Act or is being transported in a vehicle by the 25licensee in accordance with all other applicable provisions of 26law.  HB5620- 8 -LRB104 16239 BDA 29623 b1    (d) Signs stating that the carrying of firearms is 2prohibited shall be clearly and conspicuously posted at the 3entrance of a building, premises, or real property specified 4in this Section as a prohibited area, unless the building or 5premises is a private residence. Signs shall be of a uniform 6design as established by the Illinois State Police and shall 7be 4 inches by 6 inches in size. The Illinois State Police 8shall adopt rules for standardized signs to be used under this 9subsection.10(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 11revised 7-11-25.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.